South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3500.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1140 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (15) contributions to and distributions from a qualified retirement plan that are not subject to a penalty for premature distribution. For purposes of this item, qualified retirement plans include those plans defined in Internal Revenue Code Sections 408 and 457. Amounts deducted pursuant to this section shall reduce the deduction allowed pursuant to Section 12-6-1170 in an equal amount. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and applies to income tax years beginning after 2024. ----XX----